Massachusetts, session 194th, H4466.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of chapter 258B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the last paragraph and inserting in place
thereof the following paragraph:-
There shall be conspicuously posted in all courthouses and police stations a summary of
the rights afforded under this section devised and provided in digital or printed format by the
victim and witness assistance board, pursuant to section 4. The board shall further provide this
information in the top five languages spoken at home in the Commonwealth, other than English,
as provided by the most recent federal census data, and upon request, the board will respond, to
the extent possible, to any requests for additional language translations.
SECTION 2. Section 4 of said chapter 258B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking out, in line 30, the word “him” and inserting in place thereof the
following word:- them.
of 3

SECTION 3. Said Section 4 of said chapter 258B of the General Laws, as so appearing,
is hereby further amended by striking out paragraphs 4 and 5 and inserting in place thereof the
following 2 paragraphs:-
The board shall establish, adopt, and maintain bylaws relative to the operation of internal
governance.
In addition to the foregoing, the board shall:
(a) fund and support services that are available to victims across the commonwealth;
(b) provide informational material, professional development and community
education opportunities for Massachusetts victim services providers, victims, allied
professionals, medical facilities and law enforcement agencies including sharing information
relative to the victim and witness rights and services established under this chapter;
(c) advocate for policy initiatives related to access and support for victims’ rights and
services including but not limited to funding;
(d) assume the management and administration of the Garden of Peace, a public
memorial garden located on the plaza of 100 Cambridge street in the city of Boston to honor
victims of homicide, to receive gifts or grants of money or property to assist the board in the
maintenance and operation of the memorial and to establish an advisory committee which shall
consist of interested residents appointed by the victim witness assistance board to provide advice
to the board; and
(e) administer the SAFEPLAN advocacy program as established in Chapter 151 of
the Acts of 1996.
of 3

SECTION 4. Section 6 of said chapter 258B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking, in line 2, the words:- the board.
SECTION 5. Section 66 of chapter 10 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out the second sentence and inserting in place thereof the following
sentence:-
The fund shall consist of proceeds of assets seized and forfeited pursuant to the third
subclause of clause (1) of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 24 of chapter 90, and all
revenues received by the commonwealth from public and private sources as gifts, grants and
donations, together with any interest or earnings accrued on such monies through investment or
deposit.
SECTION 6. Section 66A of said chapter 10 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking out the second sentence and inserting in place thereof the following
sentence:-
The fund shall consist of proceeds of assets seized and forfeited pursuant to section 55
and 56 of chapter 265, fines and assessments collected pursuant to sections 50, 51 and 54 of
chapter 265 and section 107 of chapter 272 and all revenues received by the commonwealth from
public and private sources as gifts, grants and donations, together with any interest or earnings
accrued on such monies through investment or deposit.
of 3